hu: Otthon és kert > Fürdőszoba-kiegészítők > Törölközőállványok és -tartók: Törölközőtartók; Törölközőtartók; Törölközőállványok; Törölközőgyűrűk; Törölközőmelegítők
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 浴室・トイレ用品 > タオル掛け・タオルホルダー: タオルバー; タオルホルダー; タオル掛け; タオルリング; タオルウォーマー
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 浴室配件 > 毛巾架: 毛巾桿; 毛巾掛架; 掛毛巾架; 毛巾環; 毛巾加熱器
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ห้องน้ำ > ชั้นและที่วางผ้าเช็ดตัว: ราวแขวนผ้าเช็ดตัว; ที่วางผ้าเช็ดตัว; ชั้นวางผ้าเช็ดตัว; ห่วงแขวนผ้าเช็ดตัว; เครื่องอุ่นผ้าขนหนู
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Dodaci za kupaonicu > Stalci i držači za ručnike: Šipka za ručnike; Držači za ručnike; Stalci za ručnike; Prstenovi za ručnike; Grijači za ručnike
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ μπάνιου > Σχάρες & θήκες για πετσέτες: Ράγες πετσετών; Κρεμάστρες πετσετών; Σχάρες για πετσέτες; Κρίκοι πετσετών; Θερμαντήρες πετσετών
nl: Huis en tuin > Badkameraccessoires > Handdoekrekken en -houders: Handdoekstangen; Handdoekhouders; Handdoekrekken; Handdoekringen; Handdoekverwarmers
cs: Dům a zahrada > Koupelnové doplňky > Věšáky a skříňky na ručníky: Držáky na ručníky; Držáky na ručníky; Věšáky na ručníky; Kroužky na ručníky; Ohřívače ručníků
nb: Hjem og hage > Badetilbehør > Håndklestativer og -holdere: Håndklestenger; Håndkleholdere; Håndklestativer; Håndkleringer; Håndklevarmere
da: Hjem og have > Badeværelse – tilbehør > Håndklædestativer og -holdere: Håndklædestænger; Håndklædeholdere; Håndklædestativer; Håndklæderinge; Håndklædevarmere
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru baie > Bare și suporturi pentru prosoape: Suporturi pentru prosoape; Suporturi pentru prosoape; Bare pentru prosoape; Inele pentru prosoape; Încălzitoare de prosoape
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для ванной комнаты и туалета > Вешалки и полки для полотенец: Полотенцесушители; Полки для полотенец; Вешалки для полотенец; Кольца для полотенец; Полотенцесушители
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 욕실 부대용품 > 타월 걸이/홀더: 수건걸이; 타월 수납; 타월 걸이; 수건걸이; 수건 온열기
sv: Hem och trädgård > Badrumstillbehör > Handduksstänger och -hängare: Handduksstänger; Handdukshållare; Handdukshängare; Handduksringar; Handduksvärmare
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Banyo Aksesuarları > Havlu Rafları ve Tutucular: Uzun Havluluklar; Havluluklar; Havlu Askıları; Havlu Halkaları; Havlu Isıtıcıları
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 浴室配件 > 毛巾架/座: 毛巾杆; 毛巾座; 毛巾架; 毛巾环; 毛巾加热器
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria łazienkowe > Uchwyty i wieszaki na ręczniki: Drążki na ręczniki; Uchwyty na ręczniki; Wieszaki na ręczniki; Uchwyty na ręczniki; Podgrzewacze do ręczników
de: Heim & Garten > Badzubehör > Handtuchhalter & -ständer: Handtuchstangen; Handtuchständer; Handtuchhalter; Handtuchringe; Handtuchwärmer
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kylpyhuoneen lisätarvikkeet > Pyyhetelineet ja -pidikkeet: Pyyhekuivaimet; Pyyhetelineet; Pyyhepidikkeet; Pyyherenkaat; Pyyhekuivaimet
en: Home & Garden > Bathroom Accessories > Towel Racks & Holders: Towel Bars; Towel Holders; Towel Racks; Towel Rings; Towel Warmers
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за баня > Стойки и поставки за кърпи: Закачалки за кърпи; Поставки за кърпи; Стойки за кърпи; Пръстени за кърпи; Затоплящи кърпи
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Vonios kambario aksesuarai > Rankšluosčių kabyklos ir laikikliai: Rankšluosčių kabyklos; Rankšluosčių laikikliai; Rankšluosčių kabyklos; Rankšluosčių žiedai; Rankšluosčių šildytuvai
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phụ kiện nhà tắm > Giá treo khăn: Thanh Treo Khăn; Giá đỡ khăn; Giá treo khăn; Vòng Treo Khăn; Máy Sấy Khăn
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires de salle de bain > Porte-serviettes: Porte-serviettes; Supports de serviettes; Étagères à serviettes; Anneaux porte-serviettes; Chauffe-serviettes
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para el baño > Toalleros: Toalleros de barra; Soporte para toallas; Toalleros; Toalleros de aro; Calentadores de toallas
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para banheiro > Porta-toalhas e suportes para toalhas: Barras para toalhas; Porta-toalhas; Toalheiros; Argolas para toalhas; Aquecedores de toalhas
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori per il bagno > Porta salviette: Portasciugamani; Portasciugamani; Supporti per asciugamani; Anelli portasciugamani; Scaldasalviette
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kopalniški dodatki > Stojala in držala za brisače: Drogovi za brisače; Držala za brisače; Stojala za brisače; Obroči za brisače; Grelniki za brisače
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de casa de banho > Suportes de toalhas e toalheiros: Toalheiros; Suportes de toalhas; Toalheiros; Toalheiros redondos; Aquecedores de toalhas
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kúpeľňové doplnky > Stojany a držiaky na uteráky: Tyče na uteráky; Držiaky na uteráky; Stojany na uteráky; Krúžky na uteráky; Ohrievače uterákov